California, session 20252026, AB1343.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14528.4 is added to the Government Code, to read:14528.4. (a) To resolve local transportation problems resulting from the infeasibility of planned state transportation facilities over the Feather River in the City of Yuba City and the Counties of Sutter and Yuba, which are no longer planned to be constructed, the affected local agencies in which the planned state facilities were to be located, acting jointly with the transportation planning agency having jurisdiction, may develop and file with the commission a local alternative transportation improvement program that addresses transportation problems and opportunities in the area that was to be served by the planned state facilities.(b)The commission shall have the final authority regarding the content and approval of the local alternative transportation improvement program. The commission shall not approve any local alternative transportation improvement program submitted under this section after July 1, 2030.(c)(b) All proceeds from the sale of the excess properties, less any reimbursements due to the federal government and all costs incurred in the sale of those excess properties, shall be allocated by the commission to fund the approved local alternative transportation improvement program and shall not be subject to Sections 188 and 188.8 of the Streets and Highways Code. regional priorities.(d)(c) “Excess properties” means those properties acquired to construct planned state transportation facilities crossing the Feather River in the City of Yuba City and the Counties of Sutter and Yuba, which project is no longer planned to be constructed and is now planned as a local bridge project.